Maryland, session 2025, HB1510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
4–403.
(b) Except for a minor patient, unless a patient is notified, a health care provider
may not destroy a medical record or laboratory or X–ray report about a patient for 7 years
after the record or report is made.
(c) In the case of a minor patient, a medical record or laboratory or X–ray report
about a minor patient may not be destroyed until the patient attains the age of majority
plus 7 years, unless:
(1) The parent or guardian of the minor patient is notified; or
(2) If the medical care documented in the record was provided under §
20–102(c) or § 20–103(c) of this article, the minor patient is notified.
(d) (1) The notice under subsection (b) or (c) of this section shall:
(1) (I) Be made by:
(i) 1. First–class mail to the last known address of the patient;
[and] OR
(ii) 2. E–mail SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, E–MAIL to the last known e–mail address of:
1. A. The patient; or
2. B. If the patient is a minor and the medical care documented
in the record was not provided under § 20–102(c) or § 20–103(c) of this article, the parent
or guardian of the patient;
(2) (II) Include the date on which the record of the patient shall be
destroyed; and
(3) (III) Include a statement that the record or synopsis of the record, if
wanted, must be retrieved at a designated location.

HOUSE BILL 1510 3
(2) IF NOTICE IS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I)2 OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND NO RESPONSE OR DELIVERY RECEIPT IS OBTAINED FROM THE
E–MAIL ADDRESS TO WHICH NOTICE WAS PROVIDED, THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I)1 OF THIS SUBSECTION AT LEAST
10 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE ON WHICH THE RECORD IS TO BE DESTROYED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.